lib/dict/cs_CZ.aff
SET ISO8859-2
TRY aáeéìiíoóuúùyýbcèdïlmnòfjkprøs¹t»vghqwx

PFX N Y 1
PFX N   0           ne         .

PFX E Y 1
PFX E   0           nej        .

PFX W Y 3
PFX W   0           ne         .
PFX W   0           nej        .
PFX W   0           nejne      .

PFX F Y 10
PFX F   0           jedna      .
PFX F   0           dvaa       .
PFX F   0           tøia       .
PFX F   0           ètyøia     .
PFX F   0           ètyrya     .
PFX F   0           pìta       .
PFX F   0           ¹esta      .
PFX F   0           sedma      .
PFX F   0           osma       .
PFX F   0           devìta     .

SFX P Y 124
SFX P   0           a          [^aeokl]
SFX P   0           u          [^aeoklu]
SFX P   0           ovi        [^aeokl]
SFX P   0           e          [^aeoklurcgh]
SFX P   0           e          [aeiouyáéíóúùýì]r
SFX P   r           øe         [^aeiouyáéíóúùýì]r
SFX P   0           em         [^aeokl]
SFX P   0           ù          [^aeokl]
SFX P   0           ùm         [^aeokl]
SFX P   0           y          [^aeokl]
SFX P   0           ech        [^aeoklghu]
SFX P   g           zích       g
SFX P   h           zích       [^c]h
SFX P   ch          ¹ích       ch
SFX P   0           ích        u
SFX P   0           a          [^eì]k
SFX P   0           u          [^eì]k
SFX P   0           ovi        [^eì]k
SFX P   0           em         [^eì]k
SFX P   0           ù          [^eì]k
SFX P   0           ùm         [^eì]k
SFX P   k           cích       [^eì]k
SFX P   0           y          [^eì]k
SFX P   ek          ka         ek
SFX P   ek          ku         ek
SFX P   ek          kovi       ek
SFX P   ek          kem        ek
SFX P   ek          kù         ek
SFX P   ek          kùm        ek
SFX P   ek          cích       ek
SFX P   ek          ky         ek
SFX P   0           a          [^dtn]ìk
SFX P   0           u          [^dtn]ìk
SFX P   0           ovi        [^dtn]ìk
SFX P   0           em         [^dtn]ìk
SFX P   0           kù         [^dtn]ìk
SFX P   0           kùm        [^dtn]ìk
SFX P   0           cích       [^dtn]ìk
SFX P   0           ky         [^dtn]ìk
SFX P   dìk         ïka        dìk
SFX P   dìk         ïku        dìk
SFX P   dìk         ïkovi      dìk
SFX P   dìk         ïkem       dìk
SFX P   dìk         ïkù        dìk
SFX P   dìk         ïkùm       dìk
SFX P   dìk         ïcích      dìk
SFX P   dìk         ïky        dìk
SFX P   nìk         òka        nìk
SFX P   nìk         òku        nìk
SFX P   nìk         òkovi      nìk
SFX P   nìk         òkem       nìk
SFX P   nìk         òkù        nìk
SFX P   nìk         òkùm       nìk
SFX P   nìk         òcích      nìk
SFX P   nìk         òky        nìk
SFX P   tìk         »ka        tìk
SFX P   tìk         »ku        tìk
SFX P   tìk         »kovi      tìk
SFX P   tìk         »kem       tìk
SFX P   tìk         »kù        tìk
SFX P   tìk         »kùm       tìk
SFX P   tìk         »cích      tìk
SFX P   tìk         »ky        tìk
SFX P   0           a          [bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   0           u          [bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   0           ovi        [bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   0           e          [bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   0           em         [bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   0           ù          [bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   0           ùm         [bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   0           y          [bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   0           ech        [bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   el          la         [^bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   el          lu         [^bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   el          lovi       [^bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   el          le         [^bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   el          li         [^bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   el          lem        [^bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   el          lù         [^bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   el          lùm        [^bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   el          ly         [^bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   el          lech       [^bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX P   0           a          [^e]l
SFX P   0           u          [^e]l
SFX P   0           ovi        [^e]l
SFX P   0           e          [^e]l
SFX P   0           em         [^e]l
SFX P   0           ù          [^e]l
SFX P   0           ùm         [^e]l
SFX P   0           y          [^e]l
SFX P   0           ech        [^e]l
SFX P   o           a          o
SFX P   o           u          o
SFX P   o           ovi        o
SFX P   o           em         o
SFX P   o           ù          o
SFX P   o           ùm         o
SFX P   o           y          o
SFX P   o           ech        [^gk]o
SFX P   o           ách        [gk]o
SFX P   a           y          [^cèïijòø¹»¾]a
SFX P   a           i          [cèijø¹¾]a
SFX P   ïa          di         ïa
SFX P   òa          ni         òa
SFX P   »a          ti         »a
SFX P   a           ovi        a
SFX P   a           u          a
SFX P   a           o          a
SFX P   a           ou         a
SFX P   a           ù          a
SFX P   a           ùm         a
SFX P   a           ech        [^kïò»]a
SFX P   ka          cích       ka
SFX P   ïa          dìch       ïa
SFX P   òa          nìch       òa
SFX P   »a          tìch       »a
SFX P   e           a          e
SFX P   e           u          e
SFX P   e           ovi        e
SFX P   0           m          e
SFX P   e           ù          e
SFX P   e           ùm         e
SFX P   e           y          e
SFX P   0           ch         e

SFX I Y 18
SFX I   ï           di         ï
SFX I   ò           ni         ò
SFX I   »           ti         »
SFX I   h           zi         [^c]h
SFX I   ch          ¹i         ch
SFX I   r           øi         r
SFX I   0           i          [bdfmnptvwcèjøs¹z¾]
SFX I   o           i          o
SFX I   el          li         [^bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX I   0           i          [bdt¹¾iou]el
SFX I   0           i          [^e]l
SFX I   k           ci         [^eì]k
SFX I   ek          ci         ek
SFX I   dìk         ïci        dìk
SFX I   nìk         òci        nìk
SFX I   tìk         »ci        tìk
SFX I   re          øi         re
SFX I   a           i          a

SFX V Y 14
SFX V   0           ové        [^aekloò]
SFX V   a           ové        a
SFX V   e           ové        e
SFX V   0           ové        [^aeiouyáéíóúýì][^bdaeiouyáéíóúýì]el
SFX V   el          lové       [aeiouyáéíóúýì][^bdaeiouyáéíóúýì]el
SFX V   0           ové        [bdaeiouyáéíóúýì]el
SFX V   0           ové        [^e]l
SFX V   0           ové        [^dtn]ìk
SFX V   0           vé         o
SFX V   0           ové        [^eì]k
SFX V   ek          kové       ek
SFX V   0           ové        leò
SFX V   eò          òové       [^l]eò
SFX V   0           ové        [^e]ò
