lib/dict/cs_CZ.dic
alkoun/PI
analfabetičtějąí/YRE
Anastáz/UV
android/PI
arciopat/PIV
Artur/PV
astmatičtějąí/YRW
Augustýn/PV
Avar/PIV
Bajgar/PV
bájnějąí/YE
bankrotování/SN
Bartoąík/PV
Bařinka/PV
Belgičan/PDI
Benedikt/PV
Betlacha/PV
bezbrannějąí/YRE
bezhlavějąí/YRE
bezohlednějąí/YRE
bezprecedentnějąí/YRE
bezúhonnějąí/YRE
bezvýznamnějąí/YRE
biometeorolog/PV
blíľe/E
bobeček/HPIV
bohapustąí/YRW
Bohumír/PV
bonzák/PI
branibor/PIV
brouk/PI
Březina/PV
Bubeník/PV
Bůľek/PV
bytelnějąí/YRE
Caesar/PI
cenzurovávat/JTN
cimbálista/PD
Conlon/PV
cvičnějąí/YRE
čecháčkovątějąí/YRW
Čechoslovák/PI
Čepelka/PV
červ/PI
čtyrycetina/ZQF
čtyrycetitisícovka/ZQF
čtyrycetkrát/F
čtyrycítka/ZQF
čtyřicatero/F
čtyřicatery/F
čtyřicaterý/FY
čtyřicátník/PIF
čtyřicátý/YF
čtyřicet/FI
čtyřicetice/ZQF
čtyřicetiletý/FYR
čtyřicetina/ZQF
čtyřicetitisícovka/ZQF
čtyřicetkrát/F
čtyřicítka/ZQF
čuňák/PI
dědouąek/PIV
Dejl/PV
déle/E
delegát/PI
dementovat/ATN
dětinątějąí/YRW
devadesátery/F
devadesát/FI
devadesátiletý/FYR
devadesátitisícovka/ZQF
devadesátkrát/F
diplomat/PDI
dluľnějąí/YRE
Dočkal/PV
dodávání/SN
dojetějąí/YW
doktor/PI
dokvedlávaný/YKRN
dorazítkovat/ATN
dospanějąí/YRW
dotrnout/AN
drahouąek/PIV
Drápal/PV
dráľe/E
duch/PV
důraznějąí/YRW
dvacatero/F
dvacaterý/FY
dvacet/FI
dvacetiletý/FYR
dvacetitisícovka/ZQF
dvacítka/ZQF
dvouroček/PIV
eisenaąský/YKRN
emancipovanějąí/YRE
Emanuel/PV
encyklopedista/PD
endoparazit/PI
existencialističtějąí/YRW
exportér/PI
farmaceut/PI
Filička/PV
flagelant/PI
folklorista/PD
fousatějąí/YRW
fuąer/PIV
garant/PI
garderobiér/PI
gigantičtějąí/YRE
globální/YKRN
grázlík/PI
Gubáą/UV
gubernátor/PI
harlekýn/PI
Haspr/PV
hejsek/PIV
hezoun/PIV
historiograf/PV
hlavičkovějąí/YRW
homeopat/PI
horák/PI
hornatějąí/YRE
Houda/PV
hrůzostraąnějąí/YRE
huhlání/SN
hulvát/PI
Huml/PV
Hylák/PV
hypertextovějąí/YRW
chlapík/PI
choralista/PD
chudinątějąí/YRE
individualističtějąí/YRW
indosant/PI
inzerovávat/JTN
Ivanič/UV
Ivanov/PV
jedináček/PI
Jeroným/PV
Jersák/PV
jinonárodnějąí/YRE
jonák/PI
kačer/PI
kádrováčtějąí/YRW
Kája/PV
Kareis/PV
Kelt/PI
Kertész/PV
Klepal/PV
klimatizovat/ATN
Kocián/PV
Kolda/PV
kolosálnějąí/YRW
komunard/PI
kopista/PD
Kosík/PV
kotonový/YKRN
kozoroh/PI
koľeąník/PI
krajovějąí/YRW
Krhánek/PV
krotčejąí/YE
Kubala/PV
Kulhánek/PV
Kvasnička/PV
lapiduch/PIV
laskavějąí/YRW
Laątovička/PV
lemovaný/YKRN
Lenárt/PV
lépe/E
Lothar/PV
Loučka/PV
Lučan/PDI
magnetooptičtějąí/YRW
maňásek/PIV
man/PV
materialističtějąí/YRE
Maurer/PV
mečoun/PI
Mejstřík/PV
městnání/SN
Mikota/PV
militantnějąí/YRW
mizernějąí/YRE
Mládek/PV
moralizátor/PI
morfinista/PD
mrtvějąí/YRE
mutovanějąí/YRW
nacentrovávat/JTN
nahnilejąí/YRW
nakonfigurovávat/JTN
náměstek/PIV
nanáąenějąí/YRE
napřaľenějąí/YRW
napsal/ON
Navara/PV
navázávání/SN
neduľivějąí/YRE
nenasytnějąí/YRW
neostalinističtějąí/YRE
neurotičtějąí/YRE
Niederle/PV
ni»/ZI
nudnějąí/YRE
oblácení/SN
oblívanějąí/YRW
obvázanějąí/YRE
odcválávání/SN
odečitatelnějąí/YRW
Odehnal/PV
odlévaný/YKRN
odpornějąí/YRW
odstiňování/SN
oficír/PI
ohřívanějąí/YRW
ochotnický/YRN
Oliva/PV
onačejąí/YRE
opracovávanějąí/YRW
opraľený/YKRN
osmdesátery/F
osmdesát/FI
osmdesátiletý/FYR
osmdesátitisícovka/ZQF
osmdesátkrát/F
osmdesátý/YF
otřelejąí/YRW
ovád/PI
ovládnutelný/YKRN
packal/PV
padesátery/F
padesát/FI
padesátiletý/FYR
padesátitisícovka/ZQF
padesátkrát/F
padesátý/YF
padlejąí/YRE
Pajer/PV
pátravějąí/YRW
patriot/PI
Pečenka/PV
pekelník/PI
Petrák/PV
Piątěk/PV
planět/JN
plaąąí/YE
Pludek/PV
pocitovějąí/YRW
podejmout/IN
podmazat/ATN
podrobnějąí/YRE
podvrácenějąí/YW
pokořovaný/YKRN
polozakrytějąí/YRW
popást/IN
popuzování/SN
posel/PV
poslouchatelnějąí/YRW
Pospíchal/PV
poválečný/YRN
povázanějąí/YRE
povznesenějąí/YRW
prapraděd/PI
prodanějąí/YN
prodávanějąí/YE
profánnějąí/YRW
progresista/PD
promíąený/YKRN
propitějąí/YRW
proąukání/SN
protějąek/PIVH
protinacističtějąí/YRE
protiąpionáľnějąí/YRW
předběhovějąí/YRE
předehrání/SN
předehřátějąí/YRW
přechylovávaný/YKRN
přejímatelnějąí/YW
přeportování/SN
přesloľitějąí/YRW
přetřást/IN
převěąení/SN
přijímanějąí/YW
přilehlejąí/YRE
přimlouvající/YN
přivézt/ATN
přivlečenějąí/YRW
pták/PI
pucflek/PIV
rak/PI
redaktor/PI
relativnějąí/YRE
Renč/UV
restrukturalizování/SN
roą»ák/PI
rozepsanějąí/YRW
rozhekaný/YKRN
rozpaľovaný/YKRN
roztahovanějąí/YRW
rozvázanějąí/YRE
rozváľi/BN
Různar/PV
Ryąka/PV
sedmák/PI
sedmdesátery/F
sedmdesát/FI
sedmdesátiletý/FYR
sedmdesátitisícovka/ZQF
sedmdesátkrát/F
sedmdesátý/YF
Sekerka/PV
sepjatějąí/YRE
sestavenějąí/YRW
sinicový/YRN
skladník/PI
slavíček/PIV
slepějąí/YRE
Sloup/PV
současnějąí/YRW
spodnějąí/YRE
spoluvlastník/PI
stabilitní/YKRN
stehlíček/PI
Steiner/PV
subtropičtějąí/YRW
sumátor/PI
surovějąí/YRE
svrchnějąí/YRE
©ádek/PV
ąedesátery/F
ąedesát/FI
ąedesátiletý/FYR
ąedesátitisícovka/ZQF
ąedesátkrát/F
ąedesátý/YF
ąibeničník/PI
©kréta/PV
ąmejd/HPIV
©tilc/UV
©vajcr/PV
tádľický/YRN
Tesárek/PV
teskněji/E
těsnějąí/YRW
továrník/PI
truchlivějąí/YRE
třicatery/F
třicátník/PIF
třicet/FI
třicetiletý/FYR
třicetitisícovka/ZQF
třicítka/ZQF
Tulach/PV
turek/PIV
úkolovávání/SN
úlisnějąí/YRW
uprchlík/PI
urychlenějąí/YRE
uváľlivějąí/YRW
uzávěrový/YKRN
vadnějąí/YRE
Vaňous/PV
Verner/PV
Vincent/PI
Vízek/PV
vláhyplnějąí/YRE
Vrána/PV
vrtčejąí/YRW
vąednějąí/YRE
vybájit/ATN
výletník/PI
vyloupávaný/YKRN
vyloľitelnějąí/YRW
vynáąenějąí/YRE
vystlat/ITN
vyąperkovávat/JTN
vyvýąenějąí/YRW
vzestupnějąí/YRE
zadudání/SN
zákoník/HPIV
záměrnějąí/YRW
zaplatitelný/YKRN
záątiplnějąí/YRE
zavést/IN
závodničtějąí/YRW
zbankrotování/SN
zmalátnělejąí/YRW
zmínění/SN
znamenitějąí/YRE
zvlhčovat/ATN
Zvonař/UV
ľáček/PIV
ľíhanějąí/YRW
ľrout/PI
